Tennessee statutes. Title 63 Professions Of The Healing Arts
Chapter 4

Chiropractors

63-4-101. Practice of chiropractic — Education and clinical training — Scope of practice.

As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Differential diagnosis” means the examination of body systems and structures of a patient to determine the source, nature, and extent of a disease or other physical condition for the purpose of establishing an appropriate plan of care for the patient, which may include referral to another provider for care that is outside the scope of practice of a chiropractic physician;

“Diagnosis” means:

The differential diagnosis of human ailments through examination and evaluation of patients and through diagnostic procedures necessary to clinically correlate a physical examination to a diagnostic impression;

The ordering of X-rays, advanced diagnostic imaging, and other diagnostic procedures;

The performance of X-rays and other non-invasive diagnostic procedures, as well as minimally invasive procedures for which the chiropractic physician has received training by an institution accredited by the Council on Chiropractic Education or its successor and which have been approved by the board of chiropractic examiners after consultation with the board of medical examiners; and

The collection of blood, urine, saliva, and hair for analysis; provided, however, venipuncture shall only be done by a phlebotomist or other person who is properly trained to draw blood;

“Practice of chiropractic” means the diagnosis and treatment of patients, as defined in subdivisions (a)(1)(B) and (D); and

“Treatment” means:

The treatment of neuromuscular, musculoskeletal, and related conditions through the use of chiropractic adjustment and manipulation; physical agent modalities; manual, rehabilitative, and other therapeutic care; and mechanical, chemical, electrical, and thermal methods;

The use of acupuncture by a chiropractic physician who has completed two hundred fifty (250) hours of an accredited acupuncture course and has passed the National Board of Chiropractic Examiners Acupuncture Exam;

The location and removal of interference with nerve transmission and nerve function;

The making of appropriate referrals to other healthcare professionals for conditions that are outside the scope of practice of a chiropractic physician;

The ordering of durable medical equipment for patients who need such equipment to assist in the restoration of their health under the plan of care for treatment of their neuromuscular, musculoskeletal, and related conditions; and

The provision of supportive care with due regard for nutrition, hygiene, sanitation, and rehabilitation designed to assist in the restoration and maintenance of a patient's health.

Nothing in this chapter authorizes a chiropractic physician to engage in the practice of medicine and surgery or osteopathy, as defined in chapters 6 and 9 of this title, or to prescribe legend drugs or controlled substances.

As used in this chapter, “chiropractic physician” means a person who is a graduate of a chiropractic college accredited by the Council on Chiropractic Education or its successor, or is a graduate of an international chiropractic college approved by the board of chiropractic examiners, and who has received a license issued by the board of chiropractic examiners.

No person licensed under this title may perform a spinal manipulation or spinal adjustment without first having the legal authority to differentially diagnose and having received a minimum of four hundred (400) hours of classroom instruction in spinal manipulation or spinal adjustment and a minimum of eight hundred (800) hours of supervised clinical training at a facility where spinal manipulation or spinal adjustment is a primary method of treatment. “Spinal manipulation” and “spinal adjustment” are interchangeable terms that identify a method of skillful and beneficial treatment where a person uses direct thrust to move a joint of the patient's spine beyond its normal range of motion, but without exceeding the limits of anatomical integrity. A violation of this section is an unlawful practice of chiropractic and is grounds for the offending health care provider's licensing board to suspend, revoke or refuse to renew such provider's license or take other disciplinary action allowed by law.

Nothing in this subsection (c) shall in any way apply to the scope of practice of:

An osteopathic physician licensed under chapter 9 of this title; or

Any person who practices medicine or surgery who is licensed under chapter 6 of this title.

Acts 1923, ch. 9, § 5; Shan. Supp., § 3654a120; Code 1932, § 7013; Acts 1941, ch. 29, § 2; C. Supp. 1950, § 7013; Acts 1980, ch. 673, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 63-401; Acts 1999, ch. 323, § 1; 2003, ch. 166, § 1; 2006, ch. 775, § 1; 2017, ch. 455, §§ 1, 2.

Amendments. The 2017 amendment rewrote (a) and (b) which read: “(a) The term ‘chiropractic’ where used in this chapter is defined as the science and art of locating and removing interference with nerve transmission and nerve function. A chiropractic physician diagnoses and treats neuromuscular and musculoskeletal conditions through physical agent modalities and manipulative therapies. The adjustment, manipulation or treatment shall be directed toward restoring and maintaining the normal neuromuscular and musculoskeletal function and health of the patient. A chiropractic physician will also make appropriate health referrals for conditions that may not be treated by physical agent modalities and manipulative therapies. Patient care shall be conducted with due regard for nutrition, environment, hygiene, sanitation and rehabilitation designed to assist in the restoration and maintenance of the patient's health. Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to authorize the chiropractic physician to practice any branch of medicine osteopathy, as defined in chapters 6 and 9 of this title, or surgery, including venipuncture or the prescribing of medication, acupuncture being the exception. “(b) As used in this chapter, ‘chiropractic physician’ means a graduate of an accredited chiropractic college authorized to confer upon graduates the degree of doctor of chiropractic (D.C.), who is duly licensed in this state.”

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 455, § 8. July 1, 2017.

Cross-References. Assignment of insurance benefits to health care provider, § 56-7-120.

Duties of chiropractors regarding known or suspected child sexual abuse, §§ 37-1-403, 37-1-605.

Liability of professional societies, title 62, ch. 50, part 1.

Occupation tax on chiropractors, title 67, ch. 4, part 17.

Reimbursable services within scope of practice of chiropractor, discrimination prohibited, § 56-7-2404.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 20 Tenn. Juris., Physicians and Surgeons, § 6.

Law Reviews.

Report on Administrative Law to the Tennessee Law Revision Commission, 20 Vand. L. Rev. 777.

Attorney General Opinions. Doctors of chiropractic may not order and receive the results of diagnostic testing from licensed medical laboratories, including urinalysis, arthritis panel, urine count, glucose tolerance test, male-female endocrine profile, standard blood profile (CBC with differential), and pregnancy testing, OAG 00-131, 200 Tenn. AG LEXIS 132 (8/15/00).

Chiropractors may not practice a treatment modality that involves the insertion of needles with the intent bring about the same result as the needle insertion techniques applied in the practice of acupuncture, without first obtaining a certification to practice acupuncture, OAG 05-020, 2005 Tenn. AG LEXIS 20 (3/08/05).

A licensed physical therapist may not perform or hold himself or herself out as performing “spinal manipulation,” as that term is used in former T.C.A. § 63-4-101(c)(1) (now T.C.A. § 63-4-101(b)(1)), without first having fulfilled the requirements of that section, OAG 07-055 (4/23/07).

63-4-102. Board — Members and officers — Terms of appointment — Quorum — Administrative support.

There shall be a board of chiropractic examiners, referred to as “board” in this chapter, consisting of five (5) chiropractic physicians, residents in Tennessee who have been actively engaged in the practice of their profession in Tennessee for a period of at least five (5) years, and two (2) consumer members who are not affiliated with the practice of chiropractic. The members of the board shall be appointed by the governor and shall hold office for a term of five (5) years commencing on May 1 and expiring on April 30, five (5) years thereafter.

All vacancies occurring on the board by reason of death or resignation shall be filled by the governor for the unexpired term.

In making appointments to the board, the governor shall strive to ensure that at least one (1) person serving on the board is sixty (60) years of age or older and that at least one (1) person serving on the board is a member of a racial minority.

In order to stagger the terms of office, for the year 2000 the governor shall appoint the board members for transition terms in the following manner:

One (1) chiropractic physician and one (1) consumer member for one (1) year with the term to expire on April 30, 2001;

One (1) chiropractic physician for a two-year term to expire on April 30, 2002;

One (1) chiropractic physician for a three-year term to expire on April 30, 2003;

One (1) chiropractic physician and one (1) consumer member for a four-year term to expire April 30, 2004; and

One (1) chiropractic physician for a five-year term to expire April 30, 2005.

Any person appointed shall be eligible for successive appointments, in the discretion of the governor, and all members shall hold office until the appointment of their successors.

No chiropractor shall be eligible for appointment unless such chiropractor is actively engaged in the practice of the profession of chiropractic within this state.

Further, no persons shall be eligible for appointment on the board who at the time are actively engaged in the practice, or holding themselves out as practitioners, of any other branch of the healing arts.

The governor has the discretion to seek recommendations and nominations from the Tennessee Chiropractic Association in making appointments to the board.

The board is authorized to annually elect from among its members a president, vice president and secretary and to create such officers it deems necessary for its efficient operations. Four (4) members of the board shall constitute a quorum, and a majority of those present shall be necessary to pass or reject any official business.

The board shall be provided administrative support by the division of health related boards, referred to as the “division” in this chapter.

Acts 1923, ch. 9, § 1; Shan. Supp., § 3654a116; mod. Code 1932, § 7009; Acts 1939, ch. 116, § 1; C. Supp. 1950, § 7009; Acts 1976, ch. 781, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 63-402; Acts 1984, ch. 937, § 15; 1988, ch. 1013, § 41; 1992, ch. 817, § 3; 1993, ch. 463, § 1; 2000, ch. 618, § 1; 2017, ch. 455, § 3.

Compiler's Notes. The board of chiropractic examiners, created by this section, terminates June 30, 2021. See §§ 4-29-112, 4-29-242.

Amendments. The 2017 amendment added “within this state” at the end of (f).

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 455, § 8. July 1, 2017.

Cross-References. Division of health related boards, title 63, ch. 1.

State examining boards, general provisions, title 4, ch. 19.

63-4-103. Powers and duties of board.

It is the duty of the board to:

Examine applicants and have licenses issued to practice chiropractic to all applicants who have successfully passed the examination approved by the board or whose applications for license by reciprocity have been acted upon favorably by the board;

Conduct hearings to revoke or suspend any license or certificate under the authority of this or any previous laws authorizing the holder thereof to practice chiropractic for violations by the licensee of any of the provisions of this chapter;

Sponsor, conduct or approve such educational programs as are necessary to carry out and make effective this chapter; and

Issue advisory private letter rulings to any affected licensee who makes such a request regarding any matters within the board's primary jurisdiction. Such private letter ruling shall only affect the licensee making such inquiry and shall have no precedential value for any other inquiry or future contested case to come before the board. Any dispute regarding a private letter ruling may, if the board chooses to do so, be resolved pursuant to the declaratory order provisions of § 4-5-223.

Acts 1923, ch. 9, § 1; Shan. Supp., § 3654a116; mod. Code 1932, § 7009; impl. am. Acts 1947, ch. 9, §§ 2-4, 9; C. Supp. 1950, § 7009; Acts 1953, ch. 113, § 31; 1976, ch. 781, § 3; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 63-404; Acts 1984, ch. 937, § 16; 1998, ch. 973, § 1; 2017, ch. 455, § 4.

Amendments. The 2017 amendment substituted “approved” for “given” following “examination” in (1).

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 455, § 8. July 1, 2017.

63-4-104. Meetings of board.

The board shall hold one (1) regular meeting in each year and such additional meetings at such times and places as it may determine.

Acts 1923, ch. 9, § 2; Shan. Supp., § 3654a117; Code 1932, § 7010; Acts 1939, ch. 116, § 2; impl. am. Acts 1947, ch. 9, §§ 2-4, 9; C. Supp. 1950, § 7010; impl. am. Acts 1953, ch. 113, § 36; Acts 1976, ch. 781, § 4; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 63-405.

63-4-105. Disposition of fees — Operating expenses — Compensation.

All fees and moneys from whatever source coming into the hands of the board shall be paid by the board to the state treasurer and become a part of the general fund.

The commissioner of finance and administration shall make allotments out of the general fund for the proper expenditures of the board, and no expenditure may be made by the board until the allotment for the expenditure has been made by the commissioner. The allotments for the operation of the board shall be disbursed under the general budgetary laws of the state.

Each member of the board shall receive one hundred dollars ($100) per diem when actually engaged in the discharge of that member's official duties and, in addition, be reimbursed for all travel and other necessary expenses. The secretary of the board shall, in lieu of the per diem provided by this section, receive a salary not to exceed one hundred dollars ($100) per month as set annually by the board. All reimbursement for travel expenses shall be in accordance with the comprehensive travel regulations as promulgated by the department of finance and administration and approved by the attorney general and reporter.

Acts 1923, ch. 9, § 15; impl. am. Acts 1925, ch. 115, § 32; Shan. Supp., § 3654a129; Code 1932, § 7023; Acts 1939, ch. 116, § 8; C. Supp. 1950, § 7023; Acts 1953, ch. 113, § 36; impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 3; impl. am. Acts 1961, ch. 97, § 3; 1976, ch. 781, § 5; 1976, ch. 806, § 1(27); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 63-406; Acts 2017, ch. 455, § 5.

Amendments. The 2017 amendment substituted “one hundred dollars ($100)” for “fifty dollars ($50.00)” in the first sentence of (c).

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 455, § 8. July 1, 2017.

63-4-106. Rules and regulations.

The board is authorized to adopt such rules and regulations as are necessary to carry out and enforce this chapter and that are consistent with this chapter. Rules and regulations of the board shall be subject to the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

Acts 1923, ch. 9, § 16; Shan. Supp., § 3654a130; Code 1932, § 7024; Acts 1976, ch. 781, §§ 6, 7; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 63-407.

63-4-107. License requirement.

It is unlawful for any person to practice chiropractic within this state without having procured a license.

Acts 1923, ch. 9, § 12; Shan. Supp., § 3654a126; Code 1932, § 7020; mod. C. Supp. 1950, § 7020; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 63-408.

Cross-References. Exemption from licensing requirements for practice of medicine, § 63-6-204.

Licensure, §§ 63-1-103 — 63-1-107.

63-4-108. Eligibility for licensure.

Any person of good moral character is eligible for licensure, if that person:

Is a graduate of a chiropractic college having status with the commission on accreditation of the Council on Chiropractic Education, or its successor, or graduated from an international chiropractic college approved by the board;

Has attended a chiropractic college for four (4) school years of not less than nine (9) months each; and

Submits to the board proof of additional parachiropractic education as follows:

For applicants matriculating in a chiropractic college prior to year 2000, the applicant must provide a transcript of grades showing a minimum of two (2) full academic years of college or university work of at least sixty (60) semester hours or its equivalent from an accredited institution; or

For applicants matriculating in a chiropractic college in year 2000 and beyond, proof that a bachelor's level education or its equivalent has been obtained from an accredited college or university.

Acts 1923, ch. 9, § 4; Shan. Supp., § 3654a119; Code 1932, § 7012; Acts 1939, ch. 116, § 3; 1941, ch. 29, § 1; C. Supp. 1950, § 7012; Acts 1975, ch. 229, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 63-409; Acts 2000, ch. 618, § 2.

Law Reviews.

Tennessee Civil Disabilities: A Systemic Approach (Neil P. Cohen), 41 Tenn. L. Rev. 253 (1974).

63-4-109. Application for licensure.

Application for licensure shall be made to the board in writing or via online application.

The application shall be accompanied by the applicant's photograph and shall state the name, age, sex and place of residence of the applicant, the name and location of the school or college from which the applicant was graduated, the length of time devoted to the study of chiropractics and the date of graduation.

All applications shall be signed and sworn to by the applicant.

Acts 1923, ch. 9, § 6; Shan. Supp., § 3654a120 ½; Code 1932, § 7014; Acts 1939, ch. 116, § 4; C. Supp. 1950, § 7014; Acts 1953, ch. 113, § 32; 1976, ch. 781, §§ 7, 8; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 63-411; Acts 1982, ch. 887, §§ 1, 2; 1983, ch. 205, § 1; 1984, ch. 937, § 17; 1989, ch. 523, § 2; 2000, ch. 618, § 3; 2014, ch. 949, § 5.

63-4-110. Examination.

The examination of applicants for a license to practice chiropractic will consist of the national board examination as directed by the board. Each applicant must successfully pass all examinations before receiving a license to practice.

Acts 1923, ch. 9, § 7; Shan. Supp., § 3654a121; Code 1932, § 7015; impl. am. Acts 1947, ch. 9, §§ 2-4, 9; C. Supp. 1950, § 7015; Acts 1976, ch. 781, § 8; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 63-412; Acts 1982, ch. 887, §§ 4, 5; 1983, ch. 205, § 2; 1984, ch. 937, § 18; 1989, ch. 523, §§ 3, 4; 2000, ch. 618, § 4.

Cross-References. Temporary license pending permanent licensure, § 63-4-120.

63-4-111. Reciprocity.

Applicants possessing a valid unrestricted license to practice chiropractic in another state or other regulated jurisdiction for a period of two (2) full years are not required to be examined pursuant to § 63-4-110 and may obtain a license by fulfilling the following:

Providing documentation from the state or jurisdiction of prior practice attesting to the length of time in practice, together with any disciplinary action taken against the licensee while in practice;

Passing the Special Purposes Examination for Chiropractors (SPEC) by the national board or its successor; and

Fulfilling all other requirements of this chapter.

Acts 1923, ch. 9, § 11; Shan. Supp., § 3654a125; Code 1932, § 7019; Acts 1939, ch. 116, § 5; impl. am. Acts 1947, ch. 9, §§ 2-4, 9; C. Supp. 1950, § 7019; Acts 1975, ch. 246, § 1; 1976, ch. 781, § 9; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 63-413; Acts 1983, ch. 205, § 3; 2000, ch. 618, § 5.

63-4-112. Registration and renewal — Continuing education — Reinstatement — Retirement.

Each licensed practitioner of chiropractic shall register the practitioner's license and renew the practitioner's certificate of registration as provided in §§ 63-1-107 and 63-1-108.

In addition, every licensed chiropractor shall apply to the board for a renewal of the licensed chiropractor's certificate of fitness and pay a renewal fee as set annually by the board. Each application shall be made on a form to be furnished by the board.

The board shall renew such licensee's certificate of fitness upon application made in due form and upon payment of all required fees.

When requested, licensees shall provide the board satisfactory proof of the licensee's attendance at a chiropractic education program or programs conducted by either the American Chiropractic Association, the International Chiropractors Association, the Tennessee Chiropractic Association, or any other educational program approved or conducted by the board which consists of the minimum number of hours established hereunder for the period beginning the preceding January 1. Prior approval of such a course may be obtained by submitting the following information to the board's administrative office at least thirty (30) days prior to the scheduled date of the course:

A course description or outline;

Names of all lecturers;

Brief resume of all lecturers;

Number of hours of educational credit requested;

Date of course;

Copies of materials to be utilized in the course; and

How verification of attendance is to be documented.

Each chiropractic physician must retain independent documentation of continuing education hours attained for a period of four (4) years from the end of the calendar year in which the training is received. Such proof must be produced for inspection and verification, if requested in writing by the board during its verification process.

The minimum number of hours of required continuing education shall be at least twelve (12) hours in any calendar year.

The board may, in its sole discretion, waive the annual education requirement in cases of retirement, certified illness, disability or other undue hardships.

When any such licensee fails to renew the licensee's certificate of fitness and pay the annual renewal fee within sixty (60) days after renewal becomes due as provided in this section and/or fails to meet the annual education requirements of this section, the license of such person shall be automatically revoked at the expiration of sixty (60) days after the renewal was required, without further notice or hearing.

Any person whose license is automatically revoked as provided in this subsection (d) may make application in writing to the board for the reinstatement of such license, and, upon good cause being shown, the board, in its discretion, may reinstate such license upon the payment of all past due fees and the payment of fifty dollars ($50.00) and upon further conditions as the board may require.

Any person licensed to practice by this chapter who has retired or may hereafter retire from such practice in this state shall not be made to register as required by this chapter if such person files with this board an affidavit on a form to be furnished by the board, which affidavit shall state the date on which such person retired from such practice and such other facts as shall tend to verify such retirement as the board shall deem necessary. If such person thereafter desires to reengage in such practice in this state, such person shall apply for reinstatement with the board on a form provided by the board, provide proof of continuing education as established by the board and shall meet other requirements as may be set by the board.

Acts 1923, ch. 9, § 12; Shan. Supp., § 3654a126; Code 1932, § 7020; impl. am. Acts 1947, ch. 9, §§ 5, 6; C. Supp. 1950, § 7020; Acts 1953, ch. 113, § 34; modified; Acts 1963, ch. 116, § 1; 1975, ch. 335, § 1; 1976, ch. 406, § 3; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 63-414; Acts 1986, ch. 675, §§ 1, 2, 4, 18; 1989, ch. 360, §§ 18, 19; 1989, ch. 523, § 5; 1993, ch. 215, §§ 1-3; 1996, ch. 940, § 1; 2000, ch. 618, § 6; 2005, ch. 81, § 1; 2017, ch. 455, § 6.

Amendments. The 2017 amendment deleted “the Tennessee Chiropractic Society” preceding “or any other” in the first sentence of the introductory paragraph of (c)(2)(A).

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 455, § 8. July 1, 2017.

Cross-References. Retirement, § 63-1-111.

Attorney General Opinions. Constitutionality, OAG 94-010, 1994 Tenn. AG LEXIS 6 (2/2/94).

Constitutionality, OAG 95-006, 1995 Tenn. AG LEXIS 7 (2/8/95).

63-4-113. Applicability of health laws — Birth certificates prohibited.

Chiropractic practitioners shall observe and be subject to all state and municipal regulations relating to the control of contagious and infectious diseases and any and all matters pertaining to public health, reporting to proper health officers the same as other practitioners.

Nothing in this chapter shall permit any chiropractor to make or execute a birth certificate.

Acts 1923, ch. 9, § 17; Shan. Supp., § 3654a131; Code 1932, § 7025; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 63-415.

63-4-114. Denial, suspension or revocation of license or certificate.

The board has the duty and authority to suspend for a specified time, within the discretion of the board, or to revoke any license to practice chiropractic, or to otherwise discipline any licensee or refuse to grant any certificate of fitness, whenever the licensee or applicant is found guilty of any of the following acts or offenses:

Fraud in procuring a license or certificate;

Conviction of a felony for violations of any law of the state or of the United States;

Habitual intoxication or personal misuse of any drugs or the use of intoxicating liquors, narcotics, controlled substances, controlled substance analogues or other drugs or stimulants in such manner as to adversely affect the person's ability to practice chiropractic;

Immoral, unethical, unprofessional or dishonorable conduct;

In-person solicitation, telemarketing, or telephonic solicitation by licensees, employees of licensees, agents of licensees, or independent contractors of licensees to victims of an accident or disaster, unless it is a victim with whom a licensee has a family or prior professional relationship, shall be considered unethical if carried out within thirty (30) days of the accident or disaster;

Telemarketing transcripts shall be maintained for a period of two (2) years following their utilization;

A log of contacts shall be maintained for a period of two (2) years following a telemarketing encounter; and

This subdivision (5) shall not prohibit solicitation by targeted direct mail advertising or other forms of written, radio, or television advertising; provided, that the advertising does not involve coercion, duress, or harassment and is not false, deceptive, or misleading;

Division of fees or agreeing to split or divide fees received for professional services with any person for bringing or referring a patient;

Professional connection or association with any person, firm or corporation in any manner in an effort to avoid and circumvent this chapter or lending one's name to another for the illegal practice of chiropractic by such person;

Rebating or offering to rebate to an insured any payment by the insured's third-party payor to the licensee for services or treatments rendered under the insured's policy;

Submitting to any third-party payor a claim for a service or treatment at an inflated fee or charge or a greater fee or charge than the usual fee the licensee charges for that service or treatment when the service or treatment is rendered without third-party reimbursement;

Submitting to any third-party payor a claim for a service or treatment at a fee or charge in an amount greater than that advertised for such service or treatment at the time of the rendering of the service or treatment that is the subject matter of the claim;

Knowingly or purposefully incorrectly reporting services rendered, reporting incorrect treatment dates or reporting charges for services not rendered for the purpose of obtaining payment from a third-party payor;

Any other unprofessional or unethical conduct that may be specified by the board from time to time by means of rules and regulations duly published and promulgated by the board or the violation of any provision of this chapter;

The advertising of chiropractic business in which untrue or misleading statements are made or causing the publication or circulation of fraudulent advertising relative to any disease, human ailment or condition;

Invasion of a field of practice in which the licensee is not licensed to practice or is not within the limits of the licensee's respective callings as determined by the board;

Gross health care liability or a pattern of continued or repeated health care liability, ignorance, negligence or incompetence in the course of chiropractic practice; and

Making false, fraudulent, misleading, extravagant or grossly improbable claims or statements as to the efficacy or value of the science or practice of chiropractic.

An action taken under this section shall be subject to the applicable provisions of the Fresh Start Act that are compiled in chapter 1, part 1 of this title.

Acts 1923, ch. 9, § 13; Shan. Supp., § 3654a127; Code 1932, § 7021; Acts 1939, ch. 116, § 7; impl. am. Acts 1947, ch. 9, §§ 2-4, 9; C. Supp. 1950, § 7021; Acts 1976, ch. 781, § 10; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 63-416; Acts 1982, ch. 887, § 6; 1984, ch. 545, § 1; 1988, ch. 747, § 1; 1998, ch. 973, § 2; 2012, ch. 798, § 35; 2012, ch. 848, § 68; 2015, ch. 121, § 1; 2018, ch. 745, § 24.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 1988, ch. 747, § 2 provided that, by the amendment by that act, no action of any kind may be undertaken against any licensed chiropractor in the state because of any alleged contravention of former subdivisions, concerning advertising reduced fees and abrogation of patients' obligations for payment, which may have taken place during their existence.

Amendments. The 2018 amendment added (b).

Effective Dates. Acts 2018, ch. 745, § 46. July 1, 2018.

Cross-References. Grounds for license denial, suspension or revocation, § 63-6-214.

Law Reviews.

Tennessee Civil Disabilities: A Systemic Approach (Neil P. Cohen), 41 Tenn. L. Rev. 253 (1974).

63-4-115. Procedure for suspension, revocation or denial of certificate or license.

In enforcing this section, the board shall, upon probable cause, have the authority to compel an applicant or licensee or certificate holder to submit to a mental and/or physical examination, by a designated committee of at least three (3) practicing physicians, including a psychiatrist where a question of mental condition is involved. The applicant or licensee or certificate holder may have an independent physical or mental examination, which examination report shall be filed with the board for consideration. The committee will submit a report of its findings to the board for use in any hearing that may thereafter ensue.

The board, on its own motion, may investigate any report indicating that a chiropractor is or may be in violation of this chapter. Any chiropractor, any chiropractic society or association or any other person who in good faith shall report to the board any information that a chiropractor is or may be in violation of any provisions of this chapter shall not be subject to suit for civil damages as a result thereof.

All proceedings by the board to deny a certificate of fitness, to revoke or suspend any certificate of fitness or license or to otherwise discipline a licensee shall be subject to and conducted in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

An elected officer of the board and a hearing officer, arbitrator or mediator, if any, has the authority to administer oaths to witnesses and, upon probable cause being established, issue subpoenas for the attendance of witnesses and the production of documents and records.

The board may utilize one (1) or more screening panels in its investigative and disciplinary process to assure that complaints filed and investigations conducted are meritorious and to act as a mechanism for diversion to professional peer review organizations and/or impaired professionals, associations or foundations those cases that the board, through established guidelines, deems appropriate. Upon diversion, such entities shall retain the same immunity as provided by law for the board.

The screening panels shall consist of as many members as the board directs, but shall include at least one (1) but no more than three (3) licensed chiropractors, who may be members of the board or may serve either voluntarily or through employment by or under contract with the board.

The activities of the screening panels and any mediation or arbitration sessions shall not be construed as meetings of an agency for purposes of the open meetings laws, compiled in title 8, chapter 44, and shall remain confidential. The members of the screening panels, mediators and arbitrators have a deliberative privilege and the same immunity as provided by law for the board and are not subject to deposition or subpoena to testify regarding any matter or issues raised in any contested case, criminal prosecution or civil lawsuit that may result from or be incident to cases processed before them.

Notwithstanding any provision of the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act to the contrary, hearing officers are authorized to and may hear board mediation, arbitration or disciplinary contested cases, but may not issue final orders in contested case matters. Notwithstanding any of §§ 4-5-314 and 4-5-315, that may be or are inconsistent, such hearing officers may only issue findings of fact and conclusions of law, which shall be referred directly to the board or a duly constituted panel thereof for final action. The board or duly constituted panel, after hearing testimony or arguments from both parties regarding the appropriate disciplinary action and, if allowed by the board, arguments on any controversy raised by the hearing officer's or designee's order, shall issue a final order to include the imposition of what, if any, disciplinary action is deemed appropriate. Only the board or a duly constituted panel thereof shall have the authority to issue final orders that dispose of a pending contested case, regardless of whether the issues resulting in the dispositive action are procedural, substantive, factual or legal. If a hearing officer is not available when a contested case, or any motion filed therein requiring action, is ready and scheduled to be heard or fails to timely prepare findings and conclusions pursuant to board established guidelines, the board or a duly constituted panel thereof may rule on the motions and/or hear the contested case or utilize the record compiled before the hearing officers and prepare its own findings of fact, conclusions of law and then issue a final order. With regard to findings or conclusions issued by the hearing officer or any mediator or arbitrator, the board or any duly constituted panel thereof that reviews the case may do any of the following:

Adopt the hearing officer's, mediator's or arbitrator's findings of fact and conclusions of law, in whole or in part;

Make its own findings of fact and conclusions of law, based solely on the record and the expertise of the members of the board or panel, in addition to or in substitution of those made by the hearing officer, mediator or arbitrator;

Remand the matter back to the hearing officer, mediator or arbitrator for action consistent with the board or panel findings and conclusions in the matter; or

Reverse the hearing officer's, mediator's or arbitrator's findings and/or dismiss the matter entirely.

The board retains jurisdiction to modify or refuse to modify, upon request of any party, any of its orders issued pursuant to this section in compliance with procedures established by the board. The board, pursuant to duly promulgated rules, may, whenever a final order is issued after a disciplinary contested case hearing that contains findings that a licensee or other person has violated any provision of this chapter, assess the costs directly related to the prosecution of the case against the licensee or person.

Any elected officer of the board, or any duly appointed or elected chair or any panel of the board or any screening panel and any hearing officer, arbitrator or mediator has the authority to administer oaths to witnesses and, upon probable cause being established, issue subpoenas for the attendance of witnesses and the production of documents and records.

Acts 1923, ch. 9, § 13; Shan. Supp., § 3654a127; Code 1932, § 7021; Acts 1939, ch. 116, § 7; impl. am. Acts 1947, ch. 9, §§ 2-4, 9; mod. C. Supp. 1950, § 7021; Acts 1953, ch. 113, § 35; 1976, ch. 781, § 11; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 63-417; Acts 1982, ch. 887, § 7; 1998, ch. 845, § 1; 1998, ch. 973, § 3.

Cross-References. Confidentiality of public records, § 10-7-504.

Payment of costs of investigation and prosecution, § 63-1-144.

Screening panels, § 63-1-138.

Attorney General Opinions. The emergency services board does not have authority to develop and use screening panels to assist with the processing and disposition of disciplinary cases; however, the board of chiropractic examiners, board of medical examiners, and board of nursing are authorized by statute to use screening panels in their investigative and disciplinary processes, OAG 01-055, 2001 Tenn. AG LEXIS 47 (4/10/01).

The board of chiropractic examiners has authority to issue administrative subpoenas to compel the attendance of witnesses or the production of documents prior to the commencement of an administrative action, OAG 01-055, 2001 Tenn. AG LEXIS 47 (4/10/01).

63-4-116. Enjoining violations.

The board, in addition to the powers and duties expressly granted by this chapter in the matter of suspension or revocation of a license and in the matter of the refusal to issue a certificate, is authorized and empowered to petition any circuit or chancery court having jurisdiction to enjoin any person who is practicing or attempting to practice chiropractic without possessing a valid license to so practice and to enjoin any person, firm or corporation from performing any act or rendering any service that constitutes the practice of chiropractic as defined by this chapter.

No injunction bond shall be required of the board.

Jurisdiction is conferred upon the circuit and chancery courts of the state to hear and determine such cases as chancery causes and to exercise full and complete jurisdiction in such injunctive proceedings.

The board is also authorized and empowered to petition any circuit or chancery court having jurisdiction to enjoin any person who is violating § 63-4-114(a)(5). No injunction bond shall be required of the board in such proceedings, and jurisdiction is conferred upon the circuit and chancery courts of this state to hear such cases.

Acts 1923, ch. 9, § 13; Shan. Supp., § 3654a127; Code 1932, § 7021; Acts 1939, ch. 116, § 7; impl. am. Acts 1947, ch. 9, §§ 2-4, 9; C. Supp. 1950, § 7021; Acts 1976, ch. 781, § 12; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 63-418; Acts 2015, ch. 121, § 2.

Cross-References. Enjoining violations, § 63-1-121.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Court System — Chancery Court (Frederic S. Le Clercq), 8 Mem. St. L. Rev. 281.